California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10722.2.

(a) A local agency or an entity directed by the court in an adjudication action to file the request may request that the department revise the boundaries of a basin, including the establishment of new subbasins. A request shall be supported by the following information:

(1) Information demonstrating that the proposed adjusted basin can be the subject of sustainable groundwater management.

(2) Technical information regarding the boundaries of, and conditions in, the proposed adjusted basin.

(3) Information demonstrating that the entity proposing the basin boundary adjustment consulted with
 interested local agencies and public water systems in the affected basins before filing the proposal with the department.

(4) Other information the department deems necessary to justify revision of the basin’s boundary.

(b) By January 1, 2016, the department shall adopt regulations regarding the information required to comply with subdivision (a), including the methodology and criteria to be used to evaluate the proposed revision. The department shall adopt the regulations, including any amendments thereto, authorized by this section as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
 peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act, emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section shall not be subject to review by the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect until revised by the department.

(c) Methodology and criteria established pursuant to subdivision (b) shall address all of the following:

(1) How to assess the likelihood that the proposed basin can be sustainably managed.

(2) How to assess whether the proposed basin would limit the sustainable management of adjacent basins.

(3) How to assess whether there is a history of sustainable management of groundwater levels in the proposed basin.

(d) Prior to adopting the regulations pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall conduct three public meetings to consider public comments. The department shall publish the draft regulations on its Internet Web site at least 30 days before the public meetings. One meeting shall be conducted at a location in northern California, one meeting shall be conducted at a location in the central valley of California, and one meeting shall be conducted at a location in southern California.

(e) The department shall provide a copy of its draft revision of a basin’s boundaries to the California Water Commission. The California Water Commission shall hear and comment on the draft revision within 60 days after the department provides the draft revision to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 676, Sec. 4.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10722.4.

(a) Pursuant to Section 10933, for the purposes of this part the department shall categorize each basin as one of the following priorities:

(1) High priority.

(2) Medium priority.

(3) Low priority.

(4) Very low priority.

(b) The initial priority for each basin shall be established by the department pursuant to Section 10933 no later than January 31, 2015.

(c) Any time the department updates Bulletin 118 boundaries pursuant to subdivision (b)
 of Section 12924, the department shall reassess the prioritization pursuant to Section 10933.

(d) If the
 department changes priorities pursuant to Section 10933 to elevate a basin from a low- or very low priority basin to a medium- or high-priority basin after January 31, 2015, the agency formation and planning deadlines of this part shall be extended as follows: 

(1) A local agency, or combination of local agencies overlying a groundwater basin, shall have two years from the date of reprioritization to either establish a groundwater sustainability agency pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 10723) or two years to satisfy the requirements of Section 10733.6.

(2) A groundwater sustainability agency shall
 have five years from the date of reprioritization to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 10720.7, except that if the reprioritization occurs before January 31, 2017, a groundwater sustainability agency subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10720.7 shall have until January 31, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 939)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10722.5.

(a) The San Luis Rey Valley Groundwater Basin, identified as Basin 9-007 in Bulletin 118 (2016), shall be divided into an upper and lower subbasin at the east line of the western boundary of Section 6, Range 2 West, Township 10 South, San Bernardino Meridian. The portion of the basin to the west of the dividing line shall be the Lower San Luis Rey Valley Groundwater Subbasin and the portion of the basin to the east of the dividing line shall be the Upper San Luis Rey Valley Groundwater Subbasin. Until the department reassesses prioritization pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10722.4, both subbasins shall be
 designated medium priority.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, water beneath the surface of the ground within the Upper San Luis Rey Valley Groundwater Subbasin shall be included within the definition of groundwater for the purposes of this part by any groundwater sustainability agency developing or implementing a groundwater sustainability plan, except for water beneath the surface of the ground downstream of the confluence of San Luis Rey River and Frey Creek that is extracted and used as authorized under an existing appropriative water right.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that in light of the unique circumstances in the Upper San Luis Rey Valley Groundwater Subbasin it is necessary to include certain water within the subbasin flowing in known and definite channels in the subbasin’s groundwater that is subject to this part and that this
 subdivision applies to only the Upper San Luis Rey Valley Groundwater Subbasin.

(c) Nothing in this section alters any water right or the priority of any water right under state or federal law, or alters the application of Division 2 (commencing with Section 1000) to water within the Lower and Upper San Luis Rey Valley Groundwater Subbasins.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 255, Sec. 5.   (SB 779)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Establishing Groundwater Sustainability Agencies [10723. - 10724.2.]

10723.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any local agency or combination of local agencies overlying a groundwater basin may decide to become a groundwater sustainability agency for that basin.

(b) Before deciding to become a groundwater sustainability agency, and after publication of notice pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the local agency or agencies shall hold a public hearing in the county or counties overlying the basin.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the following agencies created by statute to manage groundwater shall be deemed the exclusive local agencies within their
 respective statutory boundaries with powers to comply with this part:

(A) Alameda County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, Zone 7.

(B) Alameda County Water District.

(C) Desert Water Agency.

(D) Fox Canyon Groundwater Management Agency.

(E) Honey Lake Valley Groundwater Management District.

(F) Kings River East Groundwater Sustainability Agency.

(G) Long Valley Groundwater Management District.

(H) Mendocino
 City Community Services District.

(I) Mono County Tri-Valley Groundwater Management District.

(J) Monterey Peninsula Water Management District.

(K) North Fork Kings Groundwater Sustainability Agency.

(L) Ojai Groundwater Management Agency.

(M) Orange County Water District.

(N) Pajaro Valley Water Management Agency.

(O) San Joaquin River Exchange Contractors Groundwater Sustainability Agency.

(P) Santa Clara Valley Water
 District.

(Q) Sierra Valley Groundwater Management District.

(R) Willow Creek Groundwater Management Agency.

(2) An agency identified in this subdivision may opt out of being the exclusive groundwater management agency within its statutory boundaries by sending a notice to the department, which shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site within 15 days of receipt. If an agency identified in paragraph (1) opts out of being the exclusive groundwater management agency, any other local agency or combination of local agencies operating within the statutory boundaries of the agency that has opted out may notify the department pursuant to Section 10723.8 of its decision to be the groundwater sustainability agency.

(3) A local agency listed in paragraph (1) may comply with this part by meeting the requirements of Section 10733.6 or opting to become a groundwater sustainability agency pursuant to this section. A local agency with authority to implement a basin-specific management plan pursuant to its principal act shall not exercise any authorities granted in this part in a manner inconsistent with any prohibitions or limitations in its principal act unless the governing board of the local agency makes a finding that the agency is unable to sustainably manage the basin without the prohibited authority.

(d) The decision of a local agency or combination of agencies to become a groundwater sustainability agency shall take effect as provided in Section 10723.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 357, Sec. 1.   (SB 372)   Effective September 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10723.2.

The groundwater sustainability agency shall consider the interests of all beneficial uses and users of groundwater, as well as those responsible for implementing groundwater sustainability plans. These interests include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Holders of overlying groundwater rights, including:

(1) Agricultural users, including farmers, ranchers, and dairy professionals.

(2) Domestic well owners.

(b) Municipal well operators.

(c) Public water systems.

(d) Local land use planning agencies.

(e) Environmental users of groundwater.

(f) Surface water users, if there is a hydrologic connection between surface and groundwater bodies.

(g) The federal government, including, but not limited to, the military and managers of federal lands.

(h) California Native American tribes.

(i) Disadvantaged communities, including, but not limited to, those served by private domestic wells or small community water systems.

(j) Entities listed in Section 10927 that are monitoring and reporting groundwater elevations in all or a part of a groundwater basin managed by the groundwater
 sustainability agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 67, Sec. 1.   (AB 321)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10723.4.

The groundwater sustainability agency shall establish and maintain a list of persons interested in receiving notices regarding plan preparation, meeting announcements, and availability of draft plans, maps, and other relevant documents. Any person may request, in writing, to be placed on the list of interested persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10723.6.

(a) A combination of local agencies may form a groundwater sustainability agency by using any of the following methods:

(1) A joint powers agreement.

(2) A memorandum of agreement or other legal agreement.

(b) A water corporation regulated by the Public Utilities Commission or a mutual water company may participate in a groundwater sustainability agency through a memorandum of agreement or other legal agreement. The authority provided by this subdivision does not confer any additional powers to a nongovernmental entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 7.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10723.8.

(a) Within 30 days of deciding to become or form a groundwater sustainability agency, the local agency or combination of local agencies shall inform the department of its decision and its intent to undertake sustainable groundwater management. The notification shall include the following information, as applicable:

(1) The service area boundaries, the boundaries of the basin or portion of the basin the agency intends to manage pursuant to this part, and the other agencies managing or proposing to manage groundwater within the basin.

(2) A copy of the resolution forming the new agency.

(3) A
 copy of any new bylaws, ordinances, or new authorities adopted by the local agency.

(4) A list of interested parties developed pursuant to Section 10723.2 and an explanation of how their interests will be considered in the development and operation of the groundwater sustainability agency and the development and implementation of the agency’s sustainability plan.

(b) The department shall post all complete notices received under this section on its Internet Web site within 15 days of receipt.

(c) The decision to become a groundwater sustainability agency shall take effect 90 days after the department posts notice under subdivision (b) if no other local agency submits a notification under subdivision (a) of its intent to undertake groundwater management in all or a portion of the same area. If another notification is
 filed within the 90-day period, the decision shall not take effect unless the other notification is withdrawn or modified to eliminate any overlap in the areas proposed to be managed. The local agencies shall seek to reach agreement to allow prompt designation of a groundwater sustainability agency. If agreement is reached involving a material change from the information in the posted notice, a new notification shall be submitted under subdivision (a) and the department shall post notice under subdivision (b). 

(d) Except as provided in subdivisions (e) and (f), after the decision to be a groundwater sustainability agency takes effect, the groundwater sustainability agency shall be presumed to be the exclusive groundwater sustainability agency within the area of the basin within the service area of the local agency that the local agency is managing as described in the notice. 

(e) A groundwater sustainability agency may withdraw from managing a basin by notifying the department in writing of its intent to withdraw. 

(f) This section does not preclude the board from taking an action pursuant to Section 10735.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 8.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10724.

(a) In the event that there is an area within a high- or medium-priority basin that is not within the management area of a groundwater sustainability agency, the county within which that unmanaged area lies will be presumed to be the groundwater sustainability agency for that area.

(b) A county described in subdivision (a) shall provide notification to the department pursuant to Section 10723.8 unless the county notifies the department that it will not be the groundwater sustainability agency for the area. Extractions of groundwater made on or after July 1, 2017, in that area shall be subject to reporting in accordance with Part 5.2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Division 2 if the county does either of the following:

(1) Notifies the department that it will not be the groundwater sustainability agency for an area.

(2) Fails to provide notification to the department pursuant to Section 10723.8 for an area on or before June 30, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 9.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10724.2.

No later than January 1, 2026, each groundwater sustainability agency shall do both of the following:

(a) Publish on its internet website or its local agency’s internet website the membership of its board of directors.

(b) Publish on its internet website or its local agency’s internet website an electronic link to the location on the Fair Political Practices Commission’s internet website where the statements of economic interests, filed pursuant to Section 87200.5 of the Government Code by the members of the groundwater sustainability agency’s board of directors and executives, can be viewed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers and Authorities [10725. - 10726.9.]

10725.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency may exercise any of the powers described in this chapter in implementing this part, in addition to, and not as a limitation on, any existing authority, if the groundwater sustainability agency adopts and submits to the department a groundwater sustainability plan or prescribed alternative documentation in accordance with Section 10733.6.

(b) A groundwater sustainability agency has and may use the powers in this chapter to provide the maximum degree of local control and flexibility consistent with the sustainability goals of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10725.2.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency may perform any act necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this part.

(b) A groundwater sustainability agency may adopt rules, regulations, ordinances, and resolutions for the purpose of this part, in compliance with any procedural requirements applicable to the adoption of a rule, regulation, ordinance, or resolution by the groundwater sustainability agency.

(c) In addition to any other applicable procedural requirements, the groundwater sustainability agency shall provide notice of the proposed adoption of the groundwater sustainability plan on its Internet Web site and provide for
 electronic notice to any person who requests electronic notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10725.4.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency may conduct an investigation for the purposes of this part, including, but not limited to, investigations for the following:

(1) To determine the need for groundwater management.

(2) To prepare and adopt a groundwater sustainability plan and implementing rules and regulations.

(3) To propose and update fees.

(4) To monitor compliance and enforcement.

(b) An investigation may include surface waters and
 surface water rights as well as groundwater and groundwater rights.

(c) In connection with an investigation, a groundwater sustainability agency may inspect the property or facilities of a person or entity to ascertain whether the purposes of this part are being met and compliance with this part. The local agency may conduct an inspection pursuant to this section upon obtaining any necessary consent or obtaining an inspection warrant pursuant to the procedure set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10725.6.

A groundwater sustainability agency may require registration of a groundwater extraction facility within the management area of the groundwater sustainability agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10725.8.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency may require through its groundwater sustainability plan that the use of every groundwater extraction facility within the management area of the groundwater sustainability agency be measured by a water-measuring device satisfactory to the groundwater sustainability agency.

(b) All costs associated with the purchase and installation of the water-measuring device shall be borne by the owner or operator of each groundwater extraction facility. The water-measuring devices shall be installed by the groundwater sustainability agency or, at the groundwater sustainability agency’s option, by the owner or operator of the groundwater extraction facility. Water-measuring devices shall be
 calibrated on a reasonable schedule as may be determined by the groundwater sustainability agency.

(c) A groundwater sustainability agency may require, through its groundwater sustainability plan, that the owner or operator of a groundwater extraction facility within the groundwater sustainability agency file an annual statement with the groundwater sustainability agency setting forth the total extraction in acre-feet of groundwater from the facility during the previous water year.

(d) In addition to the measurement of groundwater extractions pursuant to subdivision (a), a groundwater sustainability agency may use any other reasonable method to determine groundwater extraction.

(e) This section does not apply to de minimis extractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 551.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.

An entity within the area of a groundwater sustainability plan shall report the diversion of surface water to underground storage to the groundwater sustainability agency for the relevant portion of the basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.2.

A groundwater sustainability agency may do the following:

(a) Acquire by grant, purchase, lease, gift, devise, contract, construction, or otherwise, and hold, use, enjoy, sell, let, and dispose of, real and personal property of every kind, including lands, water rights, structures, buildings, rights-of-way, easements, and privileges, and construct, maintain, alter, and operate any and all works or improvements, within or outside the agency, necessary or proper to carry out any of the purposes of this part.

(b) Appropriate and acquire surface water or groundwater and surface water or groundwater rights, import surface water or groundwater into the agency,
 and conserve and store within or outside the agency that water for any purpose necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this part, including, but not limited to, the spreading, storing, retaining, or percolating into the soil of the waters for subsequent use or in a manner consistent with the provisions of Section 10727.2. As part of this authority, the agency shall not alter another person’s or agency’s existing groundwater conjunctive use or storage program except upon a finding that the conjunctive use or storage program interferes with implementation of the agency’s groundwater sustainability plan.

(c) Provide for a program of voluntary fallowing of agricultural lands or validate an existing program.

(d) Perform any acts necessary or proper to enable the agency to purchase, transfer, deliver, or exchange water or water rights of any type with any person that may be
 necessary or proper to carry out any of the purposes of this part, including, but not limited to, providing surface water in exchange for a groundwater extractor’s agreement to reduce or cease groundwater extractions. The agency shall not deliver retail water supplies within the service area of a public water system without either the consent of that system or authority under the agency’s existing authorities.

(e) Transport, reclaim, purify, desalinate, treat, or otherwise manage and control polluted water, wastewater, or other waters for subsequent use in a manner that is necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this part.

(f) Commence, maintain, intervene in, defend, compromise, and assume the cost and expenses of any and all actions and proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.4.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency shall have the following additional authority and may regulate groundwater extraction using that authority:

(1) To impose spacing requirements on new groundwater well construction to minimize well interference and impose reasonable operating regulations on existing groundwater wells to minimize well interference, including requiring extractors to operate on a rotation basis.

(2) To control groundwater extractions by regulating, limiting, or suspending extractions from individual groundwater wells or extractions from groundwater wells in the aggregate, construction of new groundwater wells,
 enlargement of existing groundwater wells, or reactivation of abandoned groundwater wells, or otherwise establishing groundwater extraction allocations. Those actions shall be consistent with the applicable elements of the city or county general plan, unless there is insufficient sustainable yield in the basin to serve a land use designated in the city or county general plan. A limitation on extractions by a groundwater sustainability agency shall not be construed to be a final determination of rights to extract groundwater from the basin or any portion of the basin.

(3) To authorize temporary and permanent transfers of groundwater extraction allocations within the agency’s boundaries, if the total quantity of groundwater extracted in any water year is consistent with the provisions of the groundwater sustainability plan. The transfer is subject to applicable city and county ordinances.

(4) To establish accounting rules to allow unused groundwater extraction allocations issued by the agency to be carried over from one year to another and voluntarily transferred, if the total quantity of groundwater extracted in any five-year period is consistent with the provisions of the groundwater sustainability plan.

(b) This section does not authorize a groundwater sustainability agency to issue permits for the construction, modification, or abandonment of groundwater wells, except as authorized by a county with authority to issue those permits. A groundwater sustainability agency may request of the county, and the county shall consider, that the county forward permit requests for the construction of new groundwater wells, the enlarging of existing groundwater wells, and the reactivation of abandoned groundwater wells to the groundwater sustainability agency before permit approval.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 12.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.5.

In addition to any other authority granted to a groundwater sustainability agency by this part or other law, a groundwater sustainability agency may enter into written agreements and funding with a private party to assist in, or facilitate the implementation of, a groundwater sustainability plan or any elements of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 666, Sec. 3.   (AB 617)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.6.

(a) A groundwater sustainability agency that adopts a groundwater sustainability plan may file an action to determine the validity of the plan pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure no sooner than 180 days following the adoption of the plan.

(b) Subject to Sections 394 and 397 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the venue for an action pursuant to this section shall be the county in which the principal office of the groundwater management agency is located.

(c) Any judicial action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the ordinance or resolution
 imposing a new, or increasing an existing, fee imposed pursuant to Section 10730, 10730.2, or 10730.4 shall be commenced within 180 days following the adoption of the ordinance or resolution.

(d) Any person may pay a fee imposed pursuant to Section 10730, 10730.2, or 10730.4 under protest and bring an action against the governing body in the superior court to recover any money that the governing body refuses to refund. Payments made and actions brought under this section shall be made and brought in the manner provided for the payment of taxes under protest and actions for refund of that payment in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5140) of Chapter 5 of Part 9 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as applicable.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section, actions by a groundwater sustainability agency are subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1085 of the
 Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.8.

(a) This part is in addition to, and not a limitation on, the authority granted to a local agency under any other law. The local agency may use the local agency’s authority under any other law to apply and enforce any requirements of this part, including, but not limited to, the collection of fees.

(b) Nothing in this part shall be construed as authorizing a local agency to make a binding determination of the water rights of any person or entity, or to impose fees or regulatory requirements on activities outside the boundaries of the local agency.

(c) Nothing in this part is a limitation on the authority of the board, the department, or the State Department
 of Public Health.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 6103 of the Government Code, a state or local agency that extracts groundwater shall be subject to a fee imposed under this part to the same extent as any nongovernmental entity.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (d), this part does not authorize a local agency to impose any requirement on the state or any agency, department, or officer of the state. State agencies and departments shall work cooperatively with a local agency on a voluntary basis.

(f) Nothing in this chapter or a groundwater sustainability plan shall be interpreted as superseding the land use authority of cities and counties, including the city or county general plan, within the overlying basin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 255, Sec. 10.   (SB 13)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.9.

A groundwater sustainability plan shall take into account the most recent planning assumptions stated in local general plans of jurisdictions overlying the basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 14.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Groundwater Sustainability Plans [10727. - 10728.6.]

10727.

(a) A groundwater sustainability plan shall be developed and implemented for each medium- or high-priority basin by a groundwater sustainability agency to meet the sustainability goal established pursuant to this part. The groundwater sustainability plan may incorporate, extend, or be based on a plan adopted pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750).

(b) A groundwater sustainability plan may be any of the following:

(1) A single plan covering the entire basin developed and implemented by one groundwater sustainability agency.

(2) A single plan covering the
 entire basin developed and implemented by multiple groundwater sustainability agencies.

(3) Subject to Section 10727.6, multiple plans implemented by multiple groundwater sustainability agencies and coordinated pursuant to a single coordination agreement that covers the entire basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10727.2.

A groundwater sustainability plan shall include all of the following:

(a) A description of the physical setting and characteristics of the aquifer system underlying the basin that includes the following:

(1) Historical data, to the extent available.

(2) Groundwater levels, groundwater quality, subsidence, and groundwater-surface water interaction.

(3) A general discussion of historical and projected water demands and supplies.

(4) A map that details the area of the
 basin and the boundaries of the groundwater sustainability agencies that overlie the basin that have or are developing groundwater sustainability plans.

(5) A map identifying existing and potential recharge areas for the basin. The map or maps shall identify the existing recharge areas that substantially contribute to the replenishment of the groundwater basin. The map or maps shall be provided to the appropriate local planning agencies after adoption of the groundwater sustainability plan.

(b) (1) Measurable objectives, as well as interim milestones in increments of five years, to achieve the sustainability goal in the basin within 20 years of the implementation of the plan.

(2) A description of how the plan helps meet each objective and how each objective is intended to achieve the
 sustainability goal for the basin for long-term beneficial uses of groundwater.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), at the request of the groundwater sustainability agency, the department may grant an extension of up to 5 years beyond the 20-year sustainability timeframe upon a showing of good cause. The department may grant a second extension of up to five years upon a showing of good cause if the groundwater sustainability agency has begun implementation of the work plan described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B).

(B) The department may grant an extension pursuant to this paragraph if the groundwater sustainability agency does all of the following:

(i) Demonstrates a need for an extension.

(ii) Has made progress toward
 meeting the sustainability goal as demonstrated by its progress at achieving the milestones identified in its groundwater sustainability plan.

(iii) Adopts a feasible work plan for meeting the sustainability goal during the extension period.

(4) The plan may, but is not required to, address undesirable results that occurred before, and have not been corrected by, January 1, 2015. Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, a groundwater sustainability agency has discretion as to whether to set measurable objectives and the timeframes for achieving any objectives for undesirable results that occurred before, and have not been corrected by, January 1, 2015.

(c) A planning and implementation horizon.

(d) Components relating to the following, as
 applicable to the basin:

(1) The monitoring and management of groundwater levels within the basin.

(2) The monitoring and management of groundwater quality, groundwater quality degradation, inelastic land surface subsidence, and changes in surface flow and surface water quality that directly affect groundwater levels or quality or are caused by groundwater extraction in the basin.

(3) Mitigation of overdraft.

(4) How recharge areas identified in the plan substantially contribute to the replenishment of the basin.

(5) A description of surface water supply used or available for use for groundwater recharge or in-lieu use.

(e) A
 summary of the type of monitoring sites, type of measurements, and the frequency of monitoring for each location monitoring groundwater levels, groundwater quality, subsidence, streamflow, precipitation, evaporation, and tidal influence. The plan shall include a summary of monitoring information such as well depth, screened intervals, and aquifer zones monitored, and a summary of the type of well relied on for the information, including public, irrigation, domestic, industrial, and monitoring wells.

(f) Monitoring protocols that are designed to detect changes in groundwater levels, groundwater quality, inelastic surface subsidence for basins for which subsidence has been identified as a potential problem, and flow and quality of surface water that directly affect groundwater levels or quality or are caused by groundwater extraction in the basin. The monitoring protocols shall be designed to generate information that promotes efficient and
 effective groundwater management.

(g) A description of the consideration given to the applicable county and city general plans and a description of the various adopted water resources-related plans and programs within the basin and an assessment of how the groundwater sustainability plan may affect those plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10727.4.

In addition to the requirements of Section 10727.2, a groundwater sustainability plan shall include, where appropriate and in collaboration with the appropriate local agencies, all of the following:

(a) Control of saline water intrusion.

(b) Wellhead protection areas and recharge areas.

(c) Migration of contaminated groundwater.

(d) A well abandonment and well destruction program.

(e) Replenishment of groundwater extractions.

(f) Activities implementing, opportunities for, and removing impediments to, conjunctive use or underground storage.

(g) Well construction policies.

(h) Measures addressing groundwater contamination cleanup,
 groundwater recharge, in-lieu use, diversions to storage, conservation, water recycling, conveyance, and extraction projects.

(i) Efficient water management practices, as defined in Section 10902, for the delivery of water and water conservation methods to improve the efficiency of water use.

(j) Efforts to develop relationships with state and federal regulatory agencies.

(k) Processes to review land use plans and efforts to coordinate with land use planning agencies to assess activities that potentially create risks to groundwater quality or quantity.

(l) Impacts on groundwater dependent ecosystems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 666, Sec. 4.   (AB 617)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10727.6.

Groundwater sustainability agencies intending to develop and implement multiple groundwater sustainability plans pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 10727 shall coordinate with other agencies preparing a groundwater sustainability plan within the basin to ensure that the plans utilize the same data and methodologies for the following assumptions in developing the plan:

(a) Groundwater elevation data.

(b) Groundwater extraction data.

(c) Surface water supply.

(d) Total water use.

(e) Change in groundwater storage.

(f) Water budget.

(g) Sustainable yield.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   (SB 1168)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10727.8.
